Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 343.331, as amended by section 1, chapter 59, Oregon Laws 2024,  is amended
to read:
343.331. ORS 343.322, 343.324, 343.326 and 343.328 do not apply to any of the following:
(1) Any abbreviated school days that are a component of discipline imposed in compliance  with
ORS 339.250, 339.252 or 343.155 (5) or that  are the result of a placement made as provided by ORS
343.177.
(2) A student’s exclusion from schools due to the student’s immunization status  or due to the
student’s exposure to a restrictable disease, as provided by ORS 433.235 to 433.284.
(3) The exclusion of a student from schools or the closure  or restriction of access to schools due
to actions taken under a public health emergency authorized under ORS 433.441 to 433.452.
(4) A student who has fulfilled all state requirements for graduation with a high school diploma,
as described in ORS 329.451 (2), when the parent or foster parent has agreed to the abbreviated
school day program.
(5) A student enrolled in a program described in ORS  336.585, 336.590, 339.129, 343.261, 343.961
(1)(c)(A)(i) or 346.010, if the student has meaningful access  to the same number of hours of instruc-
tion and educational services as the majority of  other students enrolled in the same program as the
student.
(6) A student whose parent or foster parent has notified an education service  district that the
student is being taught by a parent, legal guardian or private teacher under ORS 339.035.
(7) A student who is excluded from, or limited access to, school due to a court order.
(8) A student who is voluntarily enrolled  in a public charter school in compliance with
ORS chapter 338 when:
(a) The majority of the students enrolled in the public charter school  are not students
with disabilities;
(b) The public charter  school is not designed for the purpose of serving students with
challenging behaviors or complex medical needs;
(c) The public charter school has a longer  school year than the school year for the school
district in which the public charter school is located;
(d) As calculated for the school year, the regular schedule of the public charter school
provides at least 95 percent of  the total number of hours provided to the majority of other
students who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 735 (SB 735-A) Page 1
(e) The student is not restricted to attending fewer hours of instruction and  educational
services than the number of hours of instruction and educational services attended  by the
majority of students without disabilities who are in the same grade and who  attend the same
public charter school.
[(8)] (9) A high school student who is voluntarily enrolled in  an alternative education program
in compliance with ORS 336.635, the Expanded Options Program under ORS 340.005 to 340.090  or
an accelerated college credit program as defined in ORS 340.300, when:
(a) The majority of the students of the program are not students with disabilities;
(b) The student is not  restricted to attending fewer hours of instruction and educational services
than the number of hours of instruction and educational services attended by the majority  of stu-
dents without disabilities who are in the same grade and who attend the same program; and
(c) For an  alternative education program in which the student is enrolled under ORS 336.635,
the school district informs  the parent or foster parent, in writing and in a language and format ac-
cessible to the parent or foster parent,  that upon written request of the parent or foster parent, the
student will be immediately restored to a school that  allows the student to access the same number
of hours of instruction and educational services that are provided to the majority of other students
who are in the same grade within the student’s resident school district.
[(9)] (10) A student who, when registering for classes for a term or semester  of a school year,
voluntarily does not schedule a  class for one or more class periods. The provisions of this subsection
apply only if the student is:
(a) In grade 11 or 12 and is on track to fulfill all state  requirements for graduation with a high
school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (2), or a modified diploma,  as described in ORS 329.451
(7), within four years of starting grade 9; or
(b) On track to fulfill all state requirements  for graduation with a high school diploma, as de-
scribed in ORS 329.451 (2),  or a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (7), by the end of the
school year in which the student voluntarily  does not schedule a class for one or more class periods.
[(10)] (11) Asynchronous instruction if the instruction:
(a) Is for only one class per term or semester;
(b) Satisfies a credit requirement for a high school diploma, as described in ORS 329.451  (2), or
a modified diploma, as described in ORS 329.451 (7);
(c) Is a credit recovery class or is a class not otherwise available to the student;
(d) Is offered  to students on a voluntary basis and is not restricted to only students with a dis-
ability; and
(e) Is accessible to a student while the student is at school  and while staff of the school are
immediately available to the student.
SECTION 2.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 735 (SB 735-A) Page 2
Passed by Senate April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 8, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 735 (SB 735-A) Page 3